Arkansas statutes. Title 13 Libraries, Archives, and Cultural Resources
Chapter 7 Historic Preservation
Subchapter 3

— Historic Arkansas Museum Commission

Effective Dates.

Acts 1939, No. 388, § 7: approved Mar. 18, 1939. Emergency clause provided: “It is found that the buildings referred to in this act constitute one of the most important historic centers in the state, and that an allotment of Public Works Administration labor to aid in their restoration has been approved, but to secure it the restoration work will need to be started before June 1 this year; and it is further found that in their present condition of repair some of the said buildings have been ordered removed by the city, and that unless the work of restoring said buildings is started before June 1 of this year there is grave danger that some of said buildings, and the opportunity of acquiring the site and restoring this important historic center, will be lost; and it is found necessary, for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, that this measure become effective without delay; and this act shall take effect and be in force on and after its passage.”

Acts 1967, No. 76, § 7: Feb. 13, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas Territorial Capitol Restoration Commission is in dire immediate need of additional lands for the construction of additional facilities for the Territorial Restoration and that this act is immediately necessary to give the commission the authority to acquire said additional lands. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of public peace, health and safety shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 379, § 5: Mar. 7, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law regarding the composition of the Arkansas Territorial Capitol Restoration Commission is vague; that this Act is intended to make clear that the commission is composed of the people serving on the effective date of this Act and that their successors shall be selected by the remaining members of the commission; that surplus funds in the hands of the commission at the end of each fiscal year are cash funds and should not be deposited in the State Treasury; that this Act clarifies the law and should be given immediate effect in order to eliminate the confusion as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2013, No. 716, § 2: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that under §25-15-105, the authority of the Historic Arkansas Museum Commission to charge certain fees currently collected by the commission will expire on July 1, 2013, and that this act is necessary to allow the commission to continue to collect the revenues it currently receives and to allow the commission to maintain its current level of operation. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-7-301. Acquisition and restoration of property — Historic center.

(a)

The state shall acquire title to the east one-half (½) of Block 32 of the Original City of Little Rock, Arkansas, on which is situated:

(1)

The building that was the last capitol building of the Territory of Arkansas, in which was adopted the first Constitution for the State of Arkansas;

(2)

A building designed by the architect of the Old State Capitol;

(3)

The building in which was published the second newspaper to be published west of the Mississippi River; and

(4)

A historic building more than one hundred (100) years old.

(b)

The state shall restore the buildings to their original condition so far as possible and landscape the grounds surrounding them for the purpose of maintaining them as a historic center, interesting to the inhabitants of the state and to tourists who visit Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 388, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-101.

13-7-302. Commission created — Duties and powers.

(a)

The Historic Arkansas Museum Commission is established and shall have the following powers:

(1)

To have charge of the work of restoring the old Arkansas Territorial Capitol and the other historic buildings on the land;

(2)

To furnish the buildings with furniture appropriate to the period when they were occupied;

(3)

To improve the appearance of the grounds surrounding them;

(4)

To maintain a historic center to be known as the Historic Arkansas Museum; and

(5)

To secure any additional funds and contributions of labor and material that they may be able to obtain for the project from any United States Government agency and from private subscriptions to assist in defraying the cost of restoration and to disburse in the restoration all the funds so received.

(b)

The commissioners shall have power to request the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism to employ all architects and other employees necessary in carrying out restoration and in maintaining a historic center after restoration is accomplished.

(c)

All powers, duties, assets, and liabilities of the Arkansas Territorial Capitol Restoration Commission shall hereafter be powers, duties, assets, and liabilities of the Historic Arkansas Museum Commission.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 388, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 8-102, 8-103; Acts 2001, No. 69, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §
5607.

Publisher's Notes.

The Arkansas Territorial Capitol Restoration Commission was transferred to the Department of Arkansas Heritage by Acts 1975, No. 1001, § 4.

Acts 1939, No. 388, § 2 provided in part that the commission would acquire the land specified in §13-7-301 and have it deeded to the State of Arkansas for a price not exceeding $17,500.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment substituted “Historic Arkansas Museum Commission” for “Arkansas Territorial Capitol Restoration Commission” in the introductory language of (a); inserted “to be known as the Historic Arkansas Museum” in (a)(4); added (c); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “request the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism to employ all” for “employ” in (b).

13-7-303. Members.

(a)

The Historic Arkansas Museum Commission shall be composed of not fewer than seven (7) nor more than eleven (11) members and vacancies on the commission shall be filled by the remaining members.

(b)

None of the commissioners shall receive any salary or other remuneration for their services.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 388, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-103; Acts 1989, No. 379, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1939, No. 388, § 2, in part, appointed certain individuals, by name, to serve as the initial members of the commission.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The operation of subsection (b) may be affected by the enactment of Acts 1995, No. 1211, codified as §25-16-901 et seq., concerning mileage reimbursement for members of state boards and commissions.

13-7-304. Commission accounts.

The members of the Historic Arkansas Museum Commission shall keep strict account of all moneys received and disbursed by them and by their order and shall file a statement thereof annually with the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, who shall properly check and audit the statement of account and the books of the commission.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 388, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-104; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3377.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration”.

13-7-305. Admission fees — Disposition of revenues.

(a)

Before and after the restoration work on the Historic Arkansas Museum is completed, the Historic Arkansas Museum Commission may charge an admission fee thereto as it deems appropriate.

(b)

The commission may charge a facility rental fee as it deems appropriate.

(c)

The funds realized from admission fees, the sale of souvenirs, facility rental fees, and from other sources connected with the project shall be used for the maintenance of the
Historic Arkansas Museum so far as necessary.

(d)

Any surplus funds from these sources of income that may be in the hands of the commission at the end of each fiscal year shall be deemed cash funds.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 388, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-105; Acts 1989, No. 379, § 2; 2013, No. 716, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment inserted (b) and redesignated existing (b) and (c) accordingly; and inserted “facility rental fees” in present (c).

13-7-306. Acquisition of additional property — Restoration.

(a)

The Historic Arkansas Museum Commission is authorized to acquire for and in the name of the State of Arkansas, by purchase, gift, donation, or otherwise, the title to the west one-half (½) of Block 32 of the Original City of Little Rock, Arkansas, which adjoins the present property owned by the State of Arkansas upon which the buildings housing the Arkansas Territorial Capitol and other historic buildings and facilities are located.

(b)

The commission is authorized to acquire for and in the name of the State of Arkansas, by purchase, gift, donation, or otherwise, the title to property which is adjacent to Block 32 of the Original City of Little Rock, Arkansas.

(c)

The commission may use its property and make improvements thereon as it deems to be in the furtherance of the aims and purposes of the commission as prescribed by law.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 76, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-106; Acts 2001, No. 69, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment substituted “Historic Arkansas Museum Commission” for “Arkansas Territorial Capitol Restoration Commission” in (a); inserted (b) and redesignated former (b) as (c); and, in (c), deleted “Upon acquiring title to the west one-half (½) of Block 32” from the beginning and substituted “use its property” for “use it for.”

13-7-307. Acceptance of gifts.

The Historic Arkansas Museum Commission is authorized to accept and receive any and all gifts, grants, donations, and contributions of real and personal property and to manage and use the property and the income therefrom for the construction, reconstruction, restoration, and maintenance of buildings or facilities and for other improvements on the property.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 76, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-107; Acts 2001, No. 69, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment substituted “Historic Arkansas Museum Commission” for “Arkansas Territorial Capitol Restoration Commission”; and substituted “the property” for “Block 32 of the Original City of Little Rock, the Territorial Capitol Restoration Grounds” at the end.

13-7-308. Certificates of indebtedness — Restrictions — Liability.

(a)(1)

The Historic Arkansas Museum Commission is authorized to issue certificates of indebtedness for the purpose of obtaining funds for construction, reconstruction, and restoration of buildings and facilities, and for making other improvements, on Block 32 of the Original City of Little Rock.

(2)

The commission may pledge the income derived from real or personal property received as a gift, grant, donation, or contribution as authorized in §13-7-307 to secure such evidences of indebtedness.

(b)

Nothing in this section and §§13-7-306,13-7-307, and13-7-309 shall be construed to authorize the commission to pledge revenues derived from fees charged for admission to buildings and facilities located on Block 32 or from the sale of souvenirs therein, and these revenues shall continue to be used for the purposes provided in §13-7-305.

(c)

Certificates of indebtedness issued pursuant to the authority granted in this section and §§13-7-306,13-7-307, and13-7-309 shall be obligations of the commission and shall in no event be considered a debt for which the faith and credit of the state or any of its revenues are pledged, nor shall the certificates be considered or deemed a debt of the individual members of the commission.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 76, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-108.

13-7-309. Forms of certificates of indebtedness.

(a)

Certificates of indebtedness issued pursuant to the authority granted in this subchapter shall be in such form and denomination and shall have such dates of maturity and bear such interest rate or rates as the Historic Arkansas Museum Commission shall determine.

(b)

No certificates shall mature more than twenty (20) years from date of issue.

(c)

The certificates shall contain provision for their redemption in advance of their maturity at the option of the commission.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 76, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-109.

Subchapter 4

— Prairie Grove Battlefield Commission

13-7-401 — 13-7-405. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter, concerning the Prairie Grove Battlefield Commission, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5608, effective July 1, 2019, and by Acts 2019, No. 1091, § 3, effective July 24, 2019. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

13-7-401. Acts 1957, No. 197, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 8-601, 8-602; Acts 2005, No. 1278, § 1.

13-7-402. Acts 1957, No. 197, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-603; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 83; 2005, No. 1278, § 1.

Former §§
13-7-403 —13-7-405 were repealed by Acts 2005, No. 1278, § 1. The sections were derived from the following sources:

13-7-403. Acts 1957, No. 197, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-604.

13-7-404. Acts 1957, No. 197, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-605.

13-7-405. Acts 1957, No. 197, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 8-606.

Subchapter 5

— Historic Preservation Loan Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 1993, No. 156, § 11: Feb. 17, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that many historic properties are in dire need of restoration, rehabilitation, and repair; that in order to preserve these properties, public assistance is vital; that this act provides a program for such assistance; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to implement the program as soon as possible and thereby preserve our historic structures. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-7-501. Title.

This subchapter may be cited as the Historic Preservation Loan Act.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 156, § 1.

13-7-502. Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to provide owners of registered cultural properties in Arkansas with low-cost financial assistance in the restoration, rehabilitation, and repair of properties listed in the State Register of Historic Places or National Register of Historic Places, which are a part of the state's heritage and which contribute substantially to the state's economic well-being and to a sound and proper balance between preservation and development, through the creation of a self-sustaining revolving loan program to rehabilitate, repair, and restore historic properties.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 156, § 2; 1995, No. 1296, § 44.

13-7-503. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Fund” means the Historic Preservation Revolving Loan Fund;

(2)

“Program” means the Arkansas Historic Preservation Program created by §13-7-101 et seq.;

(3)

“Property owner” means the sole owner, joint owner, owner in partnership, or corporate owner of a registered cultural property, and includes the owner of a leasehold interest in a registered cultural property, if the term of the lease is not less than nineteen (19) years; and

(4)

“Registered cultural property” means any site, structure, building, or object entered in the State Register of Historic Places or National Register of Historic Places, or both.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 156, § 3; 1995, No. 1296, § 45.

13-7-504. Fund created — Administration.

(a)

There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, Auditor of State, and Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, a revolving loan fund which shall be known as the “Historic Preservation Revolving Loan Fund”. The Arkansas Historic Preservation Program shall administer the Historic Preservation Revolving Loan Fund and may make loans from the Historic Preservation Revolving Loan Fund in accordance with this subchapter.

(b)

The program shall deposit into the Historic Preservation Revolving Loan Fund all receipts from the repayment of loans made pursuant to this subchapter.

(c)

The program may deposit into the Historic Preservation Revolving Loan Fund any private funds made available for the purposes of this subchapter and any federal funds made available for the purpose of making grants or loans to owners of registered historic properties. Such funds may be used by the program to make or to subsidize loans made pursuant to this subchapter.

(d)

The program may deposit into the Historic Preservation Revolving Loan Fund any portion of the real estate transfer taxes deemed appropriate by the program.

(e)

In the event the program ceases to make loans from the Historic Preservation Revolving Loan Fund, any moneys remaining in the Historic Preservation Revolving Loan Fund may be transferred to the Natural and Cultural Resources Historic Preservation Fund, as certified to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State by the Division of Arkansas Heritage.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 156, § 4; 2019, No. 910, §
5609.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (e).

13-7-505. Loan program — Duties of program.

(a)

The Arkansas Historic Preservation Program shall make direct loans or loan subsidies upon such terms and conditions as it deems appropriate to owners of registered cultural properties for the restoration, rehabilitation, or repair of those properties in accordance with this subchapter.

(b)

The program shall adopt rules to govern the application procedure and requirements for making or subsidizing loans under this subchapter.

(c)

The program shall adopt rules to govern the deposits with lending institutions for making or subsidizing loans under this subchapter.

(d)(1)

The program shall adopt a system for the priority ranking of historic preservation projects, both eligible and ineligible for federal funding assistance, for which loan or loan subsidy applications have been received by the program.

(2)

The system shall be based on factors including geographic distribution of recipient projects, severity of deterioration of the registered property, the degree of architectural and construction detail in the loan application demonstrating the feasibility of the proposed restoration, rehabilitation, or repair of the registered cultural property, and availability of other funding for the project.

(3)

All loans or loan subsidies from the Historic Preservation Revolving Loan Fund shall be granted pursuant to this system, and the system shall be reviewed annually by the program.

(e)

The program shall monitor the fund and shall prepare an annual report to the Governor and the General Assembly detailing the operations of the fund.

(f)

The program has the authority necessary and appropriate for the exercise of the powers and duties conferred by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 156, § 5.

13-7-506. Loans — Criteria.

(a)

Loans or loan subsidies from the Historic Preservation Revolving Loan Fund shall be made only to property owners who:

(1)

Agree to repay the loan and to maintain the registered cultural property as restored, rehabilitated, or repaired for a specified period, but in no case less than seven (7) years;

(2)

Agree to maintain complete and proper financial records regarding the registered cultural property and to make these available to the Arkansas Historic Preservation Program on request;

(3)

Agree to complete the proposed rehabilitation, repair, or restoration work on the registered cultural property within two (2) years from the date of project loan approval by the program; and

(4)

Provide sufficient collateral security interest in the registered cultural property to the State of Arkansas in accordance with rules established by the program.

(b)(1)

A loan shall be made for a period not to exceed five (5) years with interest on the unpaid balance at a rate not greater than the yield at the time of loan approval on United States Treasury bills with a maturity of three hundred sixty-five (365) days plus three and one-half percent (3½%).

(2)

A loan shall be repaid by the property owner in equal installments not less often than annually, with the first installment due within one (1) year of the date the loan is issued.

(c)(1)

Loans shall be made only for eligible costs.

(2)(A)

Eligible costs include architectural, engineering, and planning costs, inspection of work in progress, contracted restoration, rehabilitation, and repair costs, and costs necessary to meet code requirements.

(B)

Eligible costs shall not include costs of land acquisition, legal costs, or fiscal agents' fees.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 156, § 6.

13-7-507. Donation or sale of property — Disposition of proceeds.

(a)

The Arkansas Historic Preservation Program may accept any property donated to it and may donate property or sell property to any person or entity and upon such terms as it deems in the best interest of the state.

(b)

The program may deposit the proceeds from the sale of property into a financial institution and use the proceeds for operating the program.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 156, § 7.